Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the document recording fee was initially established to cover the administrative costs associated with recording documents. Over time, this fee has been substantially increased to fund programs well beyond document recording services. This expansion has transformed most of the recording fee into a tax.(2) The legislature intends to restore the document recording tax to a fee. It costs county auditor offices in Washington state approximately $21 per document recorded. This act instructs county auditor offices to charge the public no more than their actual costs of document recording or $30, whichever is less.Sec. 2. RCW 36.18.010 and 2023 c 340 s 8 and 2023 c 277 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Except as otherwise ordered by the court pursuant to RCW 4.24.130, county auditors or recording officers shall collect the following fees for their official services:(1) For recording instruments, ((for the first page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $5; for each additional page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1. The fee for recording multiple transactions contained in one instrument will be calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing as required under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document; the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may be collected only once and may not be collected for each title or transaction))$30 per document;(2) For preparing and certifying copies, for the first page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $3; for each additional page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1;(3) For preparing noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1;(4) For administering an oath or taking an affidavit, with or without seal, $2;(5) For issuing a marriage license, $8, (this fee includes taking necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and transmittal of a record of the marriage to the state registrar of vital statistics) plus an additional $5 fee for use and support of the prevention of child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund plus an additional $10 fee to be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund. The legislature intends to appropriate an amount at least equal to the revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced homemaker act, chapter 28B.04 RCW; and(6) For searching records per hour, $8((;(7) For recording plats, 50 cents for each lot except cemetery plats for which the charge shall be 25 cents per lot; also $1 for each acknowledgment, dedication, and description: PROVIDED, That there shall be a minimum fee of $25 per plat;(8) For recording of miscellaneous records not listed above, for the first page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $5; for each additional page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1;(9) For modernization and improvement of the recording and indexing system, a surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.170;(10) For recording an emergency nonstandard document as provided in RCW 65.04.047, $50, in addition to all other applicable recording fees;(11) For recording instruments, a $3 surcharge to be deposited into the Washington state library operations account created in RCW 43.07.129;(12) For recording instruments, a $2 surcharge to be deposited into the Washington state library-archives building account created in RCW 43.07.410 until the financing contract entered into by the secretary of state for the Washington state library-archives building is paid in full;(13) For recording instruments, the surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.250; and(14) For recording instruments, except for documents exempt under RCW 36.22.185(2), an assessment as provided in RCW 36.22.185)).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 36.22.170 (Surcharge for preservation of historical documentsâDistribution of revenue to county and state treasurerâCreation of account) and 2009 c 337 s 5, 2005 c 442 s 1, 1993 c 37 s 1, & 1989 c 204 s 3;(2) RCW 36.22.175 (Surcharge for local government archives and records managementâRecords management trainingâEastern Washington regional facility) and 2019 c 448 s 5, (2019 c 448 s 4 expired June 30, 2020), 2019 c 372 s 3, (2017 c 303 s 7 expired June 30, 2020), 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 931, 2008 c 328 s 6006, 2003 c 163 s 5, 2001 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1, & 1996 c 245 s 1;(3) RCW 36.22.181 (Surcharge for prosecution of mortgage lending fraudâTransmittal to state treasurer) and 2021 c 31 s 1, 2016 c 7 s 2, 2011 c 129 s 2, 2006 c 21 s 1, & 2003 c 289 s 1;(4) RCW 36.22.185 (Covenant homeownership program assessment) and 2023 c 340 s 2;(5) RCW 36.22.240 (Surcharge for growth management planning and reviewâIncreasing residential building capacity) and 2021 c 214 s 10 & 2019 c 348 s 11; and(6) RCW 36.22.250 (Document recording surcharge) and 2023 c 277 s 1.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Any residual balance of funds remaining in the centennial document preservation and modernization account created in RCW 36.22.170 on the effective date of this section must be transferred by the state treasurer to the state general fund.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act takes effect June 30, 2026.--- END ---